North Carolina, session 2025, HB183.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
PART I. RESTRICT WAKE SURFING IN LAKE GLENVILLE
SECTION 1.1.(a) Definition. – For purposes of this section, wake surfing means the
operation of a motorboat, as defined in G.S. 75A-2, to which weight has been added in the stern
via water-filled tanks or other ballasts for the purpose of creating an artificially enlarged wake
that is or is intended to be surfed by another person towed behind the motorboat.
SECTION 1.1.(b) Prohibition. – No person may engage in wake surfing within 200
feet of the shoreline or any structure, moored vessel, kayak, canoe, paddleboard, or swimmer.
SECTION 1.2. Violation. – A violation of this Part is a Class 1 misdemeanor
punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) in addition to any other
punishment prescribed for that offense.
SECTION 1.3. Enforcement. – This Part is enforceable by law enforcement officers
of the Wildlife Resources Commission, by sheriffs and deputy sheriffs, and by other peace
officers with general subject matter jurisdiction.
SECTION 1.4. Applicability. – This Part applies only to the waters of Lake Glenville
in Jackson County.
SECTION 1.5. This Part becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
PART II. TOWN OF LOUISBURG ELECTION CHANGES
SECTION 2.(a) Section 18 of the Charter of the Town of Louisburg, being Chapter
1022 of the 1961 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 18. Time of elections. Regular biennial elections of municipal officers under this
Charter shall be held on Tuesday after the first Monday in May of odd-numbered years, beginning
in 1963.in odd-numbered years."
SECTION 2.(b) Section 19 of the Charter of the Town of Louisburg, being Chapter
1022 of the 1961 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 19. General laws govern. Said elections Conduct of elections. The council shall be
elected using the nonpartisan plurality method of election as provided in G.S. 163-292. The
mayor shall be elected using the nonpartisan election and runoff method of election as provided
in G.S. 163-293. However, if no more than two candidates file a notice of candidacy for the office
of mayor for a municipal election in which that office is on the ballot, the mayor shall be elected
using the nonpartisan plurality method of election as provided in G.S. 163-292. Elections shall
be held pursuant to the general State laws governing elections of municipal officers."
SECTION 2.(c) This Part is effective when it becomes law and applies to elections
held on or after that date.
PART III. HENDERSON COUNTY/BLUE RIDGE COMMUNITY COLLEGE
CONSTRUCTION
*H183-v-6*

SECTION 3.1.(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 115D-9, 115D-15.1, and 143-341(3) or any
other provision of law, Henderson County is hereby authorized to construct community college
buildings, as that term is defined in G.S. 143-336, on the campuses of Blue Ridge Community
College located within Henderson County. For purposes of this Part, the term "construct" and
"construction" includes making additions, improvements, renovations, or repairs to all or any
part of a community college building. Henderson County may finance the construction of these
buildings in accordance with Article 8 of Chapter 159 of the General Statutes and G.S. 160A-20.
If Henderson County finances the construction of any building on Blue Ridge Community
College's campuses, the Blue Ridge Community College Board of Trustees may, in connection
with the construction, transfer any of its property to Henderson County to be used as security for
the financing agreement. Henderson County shall transfer the property back to the Blue Ridge
Community College Board of Trustees when any financing agreement entered into by Henderson
County to finance the construction, including any additions, improvements, renovations, and
repairs, has been satisfied. Henderson County may also construct the community college
buildings using other funding sources, including appropriations made by the General Assembly.
Upon the completion of the construction of the buildings, Henderson County shall lease the
buildings to Blue Ridge Community College under the terms and conditions agreed to by both
Henderson County and Blue Ridge Community College.
SECTION 3.1.(b) In constructing buildings as authorized by this Part, Henderson
County does not have to comply with the provisions of G.S. 115D-9 or Part 1 of Article 36 of
Chapter 143 of the General Statutes. However, Henderson County shall comply with the
provisions of Article 3D of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes and Article 8 of Chapter 143 of
the General Statutes. Henderson County shall consult with the Blue Ridge Community College
Board of Trustees about programming requirements for the buildings and shall keep the Blue
Ridge Community College Board of Trustees informed as to the construction process and
progress.
SECTION 3.1.(c) Henderson County and the Blue Ridge Community College Board
of Trustees may enter into a memorandum of understanding to allow for the construction of
community college buildings by Henderson County on the campuses of Blue Ridge Community
College located within Henderson County, if deemed appropriate by Henderson County and Blue
Ridge Community College, and if the terms of the memorandum will allow for the construction
to be completed in a timely fashion and cost-efficient manner.
SECTION 3.2. This Part is effective when it becomes law and applies only to
construction projects, including additions, improvements, renovations, and repairs, coordinated
by Henderson County for Blue Ridge Community College uses and purposes.
PART IV. JOHNSTON COUNTY/JOHNSTON COMMUNITY COLLEGE
CONSTRUCTION
SECTION 4.1.(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 115D-9, 115D-15.1, and 143-341(3) or any
other provision of law, Johnston County is hereby authorized to construct community college
buildings, as that term is defined in G.S. 143-336, on the campuses of Johnston Community
College. For the purposes of this Part, the terms "construct" and "construction" include making
additions, improvements, renovations, or repairs to all or any part of a community college
building. Johnston County may finance the construction of these buildings in accordance with
Article 8 of Chapter 159 of the General Statutes and G.S. 160A-20. If Johnston County finances
the construction of any building on Johnston Community College's campuses, the Johnston
Community College Board of Trustees may, in connection with the construction, transfer any of
its property to Johnston County to be used for security for the financing agreement. Johnston
County shall transfer the property back to the Johnston Community College Board of Trustees
when any financing agreement entered into by Johnston County to finance the construction has
been satisfied. Johnston County may also construct the community college buildings using other
Page 2 Session Law 2025-15 House Bill 183

funding sources, including appropriations made by the General Assembly. Upon completion of
the construction of the buildings, Johnston County shall lease the buildings to Johnston
Community College under the terms and conditions agreed to by both Johnston County and
Johnston Community College.
SECTION 4.1.(b) In constructing buildings as authorized by this Part, Johnston
County does not have to comply with the provisions of G.S. 115D-9 or Part 1 of Article 36 of
Chapter 143 of the General Statutes. However, Johnston County shall comply with the provisions
of Articles 3D and 8 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes. Johnston County shall consult with
the Johnston Community College Board of Trustees about programming requirements for the
buildings and shall keep the Johnston Community College Board of Trustees informed as to the
construction process and progress.
SECTION 4.1.(c) Prior to the construction of any building authorized by this Part,
Johnston County and the Johnston Community College Board of Trustees shall enter into a
memorandum of understanding that sets forth the roles and responsibilities of each party for the
construction of community college buildings on the campuses of Johnston Community College
so that construction is completed in a timely fashion and cost-efficient manner.
SECTION 4.2. This Part is effective when it becomes law and applies only to
construction projects, including additions, improvements, renovations, and repairs, coordinated
by Johnston County for Johnston Community College uses and purposes.
PART V. RUTHERFORD COUNTY/ISOTHERMAL COMMUNITY COLLEGE
CONSTRUCTION
SECTION 5.1.(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 115D-9, 115D-15.1, and 143-341(3) or any
other provision of law, Rutherford County is hereby authorized to construct community college
buildings, as that term is defined in G.S. 143-336, on the campuses of Isothermal Community
College located within Rutherford County. For purposes of this Part, the terms "construct" and
"construction" include making additions, improvements, renovations, or repairs to all or any part
of a community college building. Rutherford County may finance the construction of these
buildings in accordance with Article 8 of Chapter 159 of the General Statutes and G.S. 160A-20.
If Rutherford County finances the construction of any building on Isothermal Community
College's campuses, the Isothermal Community College Board of Trustees may, in connection
with the construction, transfer any of its property to Rutherford County to be used as security for
the financing agreement. Rutherford County shall transfer the property back to the Isothermal
Community College Board of Trustees when any financing agreement entered into by Rutherford
County to finance the construction, including any additions, improvements, renovations, and
repairs, has been satisfied. Rutherford County may also construct the community college
buildings using other funding sources, including appropriations made by the General Assembly.
Upon the completion of the construction of the buildings, Rutherford County shall lease the
buildings to Isothermal Community College under the terms and conditions agreed to by both
Rutherford County and Isothermal Community College.
SECTION 5.1.(b) In constructing buildings as authorized by this Part, Rutherford
County does not have to comply with the provisions of G.S. 115D-9 or Part 1 of Article 36 of
Chapter 143 of the General Statutes. However, Rutherford County shall comply with the
provisions of Article 3D of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes and Article 8 of Chapter 143 of
the General Statutes. Rutherford County shall consult with the Isothermal Community College
Board of Trustees about programming requirements for the buildings and shall keep the
Isothermal Community College Board of Trustees informed as to the construction process and
progress.
SECTION 5.1.(c) Rutherford County and the Isothermal Community College Board
of Trustees may enter into a memorandum of understanding to allow for the construction of
community college buildings by Rutherford County on the campuses of Isothermal Community
House Bill 183 Session Law 2025-15 Page 3

College located within Rutherford County if deemed appropriate by Rutherford County and
Isothermal Community College and if the terms of the memorandum will allow for the
construction to be completed in a timely fashion and cost-efficient manner.
SECTION 5.2. This Part is effective when it becomes law and applies only to
construction projects, including additions, improvements, renovations, and repairs, coordinated
by Rutherford County for Isothermal Community College uses and purposes.
PART VI. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 6. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 26th day of June, 2025.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Destin Hall
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Page 4 Session Law 2025-15 House Bill 183